dictsource/prs_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// Text to phoneme rules for Dari

// replace Arabic character numbers with Latin character numbers
.replace
٠	0
١	1
٢	2
٣	3
٤	4
٥	5
٦	6
٧	7
٨	8
٩	9


//all vowels
.L01  َ  ِ ُ   ً ٍ   و    ا   ه   ی   ة ي

//commonly unwritten vowels
.L02  َ   ِ   ُ  

//list of consonants
.L03 ا ب پ ت ث ج چ ح خ د ذ ر ز ژ س ش ص ض ط  ظ ع غ ف ق ک گ ل م ن و ه ی

.group ا
	 _) ا  (L01	
	ا	A	
	ا (_	A
	اً	An
	اٍ	En

.group ب
	ب (L01	b
	ب	bA
	ب (_	b
	L03) ب (L03	b

.group پ
	پ (L01	p
	پ	pA
	پ (_	p
	L03) پ (L03	p

.group ة
	ة (L01	h
	ة	hA
	ة (_	@

.group ت
	ت (L01	t
	ت	tA
	ت (_	t

.group ث
	ث (L01	s
	ث	sA
	ث (_	s

.group ج
	ج (L01	dZ
	ج	dZA
	ج (_	dZ


.group چ
	چ (L01	tS
	چ	tSA
	چ (_	tS

.group ح	
	ح (L01	h
	ح	hA
	ح (_	h

.group خ
	خ (L01	X
	خ	XA
	خ (_	X

.group د
	د (L01	d
	د	dA
	د (_	d

.group ذ
	ذ (L01	z
	ذ	zA
	ذ (_	z

.group ر
	ر (L01	R
	ر	RA
	ر (_	R

.group ز
	ز (L01	z
	ز	zA
	ز (_	z

.group ژ
	ژ (L01	Z
	ژ	ZA
	ژ (_	Z

.group س
	س (L01	s
	س	sA
	س (_	s
	L03) س  (L03	s
	L02) س  (L03	s  

.group ش
	ش (L01	S
	ش	SA
	ش (_	S

.group ص
	ص (L01	s
	ص	sA
	ص (_	s

.group ض
	ض (L01	z
	ض	zA
	ض (_	z

.group ط
	ط (L01	t
	ط	tA
	ط (_	t

.group ظ
	ظ (L01	z
	ظ	zA
	ظ (_	z

.group ع
	ع (L01
	ع	A
	ع (_	@_:

.group غ
	غ (L01	R
	غ	RA
	غ (_	R

.group ـ
	ـ

.group ف
	ف (L01	f
	ف	fA
	ف (_	f

.group ق
	ق (L01	R
	ق	RA
	ق (_	R

.group ک
	ک (L01	k
	ک	kA
	L02) ک  (L03	k  
	L03) ک  (L03	k  
	ک (_	k

.group گ
	گ (L01	g
	گ	gA
	گ (_	g

.group ل
	ل (L01	l
	ل	lA
	ل (_	l

.group م
	م (L01	m
	م	mA
	م (_	m

.group ن
	ن (L01	n
	ن (_	n
	L02) ن  (L03	n  
	L03) ن  (L03	n
	ن	nA

.group ه
	ه (L01	h
	ه	hA
	ه (_	@

.group و
	و (L01	v
	و (_		u
	L03) و (L03	u
	و	vA

.group ی
	ی	i
	_) ی	jA
	
.group ي
	ي	i
	_) ي	jA

.group
	$	dol@

.group ء
	ء	@
	ء (L01

.group ّ
	ّ	:

.group آ
	آ	A

//vowels that are not usually written:

.group َ
	َ	A

.group ِ
	ِ	E

.group ُ
	ُ	o	
